Tennessee, session 114, SB0119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-9-102, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(53) and substituting:
(53) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as defined in 42 U.S.C. §
5402(6).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-1-105, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as defined in 42 U.S.C. §
5402(6).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-126-202, is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting:
(2) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as defined in 42 U.S.C. §
5402(6);
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0119
000469
- 1 -